Vermont, session 2025-2026, H671.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2121 is amended to read:
§ 2121. ELIGIBILITY OF VOTERS
(a) Any person may register to vote in the town of his or her the person’s
residence in any election held in a political subdivision of this State in which
he or she the person resides who, on election day:
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 2 of 11
(1) is a citizen of the United States;
(2) is a resident of the State of Vermont;
(3) has taken the voter’s oath; and
(4) is 18 years of age or more.
(b) Any person meeting the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)–(3) of this
section who will be 18 years of age on or before the date of a general election
may register and vote in the primary election immediately preceding that
general election.
(c) No person shall be permitted to register to vote or cast a ballot in any
election unless the person has provided documented proof of U.S. citizenship
in accordance with section 2145 of this title.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 2145 is amended to read:
§ 2145. APPLICATION FORMS
(a) The voter registration application shall be in the form approved by the
Federal Election Commission or by the Secretary of State. The application
form approved by the Secretary shall include:
(1) A place for the applicant to swear or affirm, by checking the
appropriate box, that he or she the applicant meets all voter eligibility
requirements set forth in section 2121 of this title and a place for the signature
of the applicant affirming, under penalty of perjury, that all information
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 3 of 11
submitted by the applicant is accurate and truthful. The affirmation shall
include the following information:
(A) The applicant’s place and date of birth.
(B) The applicant’s town of legal residence.
(C) The applicant’s street address or a description of the physical
location of the applicant’s residence. The description must contain sufficient
information so that the town clerk can determine whether the applicant is a
resident of the town.
(D)(1) If the applicant has been issued a current and valid driver’s
license or nondriver’s identification, the applicant’s driver’s license number or
nondriver’s identification number;
(2) If the applicant does not possess a driver’s license number, the
last four digits of the applicant’s Social Security number; or
(3) If the applicant does not possess a Social Security number, the
town clerk shall contact the Secretary of State and the Secretary shall assign a
unique identifier for the applicant.
(E) The applicant’s email address, which shall be optional to provide.
(2) The voter’s oath.
(3) Space for the town clerk to document action on the application.
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 4 of 11
(4) The following statements:
(A) “If you were provided with this application form by a voter
registration agency, you may decline to register. If you decline to register,
your failure to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter
registration purposes.”
(B) “If you are submitting this application through a voter
registration agency, the office through which you submitted this application
will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.”
(5) A requirement for documented proof of U.S. citizenship, which must
be submitted with the application and verified by the town clerk. Acceptable
forms of proof include:
(A) a U.S. birth certificate or equivalent;
(B) a valid U.S. passport;
(C) a U.S. certificate of naturalization or citizenship; or
(D) any other document issued by a government agency that verifies
U.S. citizenship.
(b) A town clerk shall record the proof of U.S. citizenship provided on the
application form and, where feasible, verify the applicant’s citizenship status
using the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements (SAVE) Program
administered by U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services.
* * *
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 5 of 11
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. § 2145a is amended to read:
§ 2145a. REGISTRATIONS AT THE DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR
VEHICLES
(a) An application for, or renewal of, a motor vehicle driver’s license or
nondriver identification card shall serve as a simultaneous application to
register to vote if the applicant attests to provides proof of U.S. citizenship or
the Department has proof of U.S. citizenship unless the applicant checks the
box on the application designating that the applicant declines to use the
application as a voter registration application.
(b)(1) A motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card
application shall provide and request the following information and shall be in
the form approved by the Secretary of State:
(A) The applicant’s citizenship.
(B) The applicant’s place and date of birth.
(C) The applicant’s town of legal residence.
(D) The applicant’s E-911 street address or a description of the
physical location of the applicant’s residence. The description must contain
sufficient information so that the town clerk can determine whether the
applicant is a resident of the town.
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 6 of 11
(E) The voter’s oath.
(F) The applicant’s email address and phone number, which shall be
optional to provide.
(2) A motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card
application shall provide the following statements:
(A) “By signing and submitting this application, you are authorizing
the Department of Motor Vehicles to transmit this application to the Secretary
of State for voter registration purposes. YOU MAY DECLINE TO
REGISTER. Both the office through which you submit this application and
your decision of whether or not to register will remain confidential and will be
used for voter registration purposes only.”
(B) “In order to be registered to vote, you must: (1) be a U.S. citizen;
(2) be a resident of Vermont; (3) have taken the voter’s oath; and (4) be 18
years of age or older. Any person meeting the requirements of (1)–(3) who
will be 18 years of age on or before the date of a general election may register
and vote in the primary election immediately preceding that general election.
Failure to decline to register is an attestation that you meet the requirements to
vote.”
* * *
(4)(A) An applicant who simultaneously applies to register to vote shall
provide proof of U.S. citizenship. Acceptable forms of proof include:
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 7 of 11
(i) a U.S. birth certificate or equivalent;
(ii) a valid U.S. passport;
(iii) a U.S. certificate of naturalization or citizenship; or
(iv) any other document issued by a government agency that
verifies U.S. citizenship.
(B) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall record the proof of U.S.
citizenship provided on the application form and, where feasible, verify the
applicant’s citizenship status using the Systematic Alien Verification for
Entitlements (SAVE) Program administered by U.S. Citizenship and
Immigration Services before processing the voter registration.
* * *
(d)(1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall transmit motor vehicle
driver’s license and nondriver identification card applications received under
this section to the Secretary of State not later than five days after the date the
application was accepted by the Department, or before the date of any primary
or general election, whichever is sooner.
(2) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not transmit motor vehicle
driver’s license and nondriver identification card applications when the
Department does not have proof of U.S. citizenship for an applicant and the
applicant has failed to attest to U.S. citizenship, or when the applicant has
designated that the applicant declines to be registered.
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 8 of 11
* * *
Sec. 4. 17 V.S.A. § 2154 is amended to read:
§ 2154. STATEWIDE VOTER CHECKLIST
(a) The Secretary of State shall maintain a uniform and nondiscriminatory
statewide voter checklist. This checklist shall serve as the official voter
registration list for all elections in the State. In maintaining the statewide voter
checklist, the Secretary shall:
(1) limit a town clerk to adding, modifying, or deleting applicant and
voter information on the portion of the checklist for that clerk’s municipality;
(2) limit access to the statewide voter checklist for a local elections
official to verifying whether the applicant is registered in another municipality
in the State by a search for the individual voter;
(3) notify a local elections official when a voter registered in that
official’s district registers in another voting district so that the voter may be
removed from that official’s district checklist;
(4) provide adequate security to prevent unauthorized access to the
checklist;
(5) ensure the compatibility and comparability of information on the
checklist with information contained in the Department of Motor Vehicles’
computer systems; and
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 9 of 11
(6) make reasonable efforts on an ongoing basis to compare the
information on the checklist with data or information contained in any State
agency’s database, a database administered by the federal government, or any
database of another state or consortium of states, where possible, in an effort to
maintain the accuracy and currency of the checklist; and
(7) direct town clerks to use the Systematic Alien Verification for
Entitlements (SAVE) Program to verify the citizenship status of registered
voters and remove any individuals confirmed to be noncitizens.
(b)(1) A registered voter’s month and day of birth, driver’s license or
nondriver identification number, telephone number, email address, and the last
four digits of his or her the voter’s Social Security number shall be kept
confidential and are exempt from public inspection and copying under the
Public Records Act.
(2) A public agency as defined in 1 V.S.A. § 317 and any officer,
employee, agent, or independent contractor of a public agency shall not
knowingly disclose a copy of all of the statewide voter checklist, a
municipality’s portion of the statewide voter checklist, or any other municipal
voter checklist to any foreign government or to a federal agency or
commission or to a person acting on behalf of a foreign government or of such
a federal entity for the purpose of:
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 10 of 11
(A) registration of a voter based on his or her the voter’s information
maintained in the checklist;
(B) publicly disclosing a voter’s information maintained in the
checklist; or
(C) comparing a voter’s information maintained in the checklist to
personally identifying information contained in other federal or state databases.
(c)(1) Any person wishing to obtain a copy of all of the statewide voter
checklist must swear or affirm, under penalty of perjury pursuant to 13 V.S.A.
chapter 65, that the person will not:
(A) use the checklist for commercial purposes; or
(B) knowingly disclose the checklist to any foreign government or to
a federal agency or commission or to a person acting on behalf of a foreign
government or of such a federal entity in circumvention of the prohibited
purposes for using the checklist set forth in subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(2) The affirmation shall be filed with the Secretary of State.
(d) An elections official shall not access the portion of the statewide voter
checklist that is exempt from public inspection pursuant to 1 V.S.A.
§ 317(c)(31), except for elections purposes.
VT LEG #385989 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.671
2026 Page 11 of 11
Sec. 5. SYSTEMATIC ALIEN VERIFICATION FOR ENTITLEMENTS
(SAVE) PROGRAM; MEMORANDUM OF AGREEMENT
On or before January 1, 2027, the Secretary of State shall enter into a
memorandum of agreement with the U.S. Department of Homeland Security to
access and utilize the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements (SAVE)
Program for the purposes of verifying citizenship status during voter
registration and for ongoing voter roll maintenance. The Secretary shall
implement bulk uploads and other available enhancements and shall report to
the General Assembly on the status of this agreement and implementation
within six months following the effective date of this act.
Sec. 6. APPROPRIATION
The sum of $300,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Secretary of State in fiscal year 2027 for the purpose of integrating the
Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements (SAVE) Program into State and
local systems and training town clerks.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385989 v.1